Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.120

Provisions of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120 exclusive.

The provisions of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120 shall be exclusive.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 256: See note following RCW 9.68.050.